Utah statutes.
32A-12-223.   Minor's unlawful use of proof of age.
(1)  As used in this section, "proof of age violation" means a violation by a
minor of:
(a)  Chapter 1, Part 3, Proof of Age; or
(b)  if as part of the violation the minor uses a proof of age in violation of
Chapter 1, Part 3, Proof of Age:
(i)  Section 32A-12-209; or
(ii)  Section 32A-12-209.5.
(2)  If a court finds a minor engaged in a proof of age violation,
notwithstanding the penalties provided for in the provisions listed in
Subsection (1):
(a) (i)  for a first violation, the minor is guilty of a class B misdemeanor;
(ii)  for a second violation, the minor is guilty of a class A misdemeanor;
and
(iii)  for a third or subsequent violation, the minor is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor, except that the court may impose:
(A)  a fine of up to $5,000;
(B)  screening, assessment, or substance abuse treatment, as defined in
Section 41-6a-501;
(C)  an educational series, as defined in Section 41-6a-501;
(D)  alcoholic beverage related community service or compensatory-service work
program hours;
(E)  fees for restitution and treatment costs;
(F)  defensive driver education courses; or
(G)  a combination of these penalties; and
(b) (i)  for a minor who is at least 13 years old, but younger than 18 years
old:
(A)  the court shall forward to the Driver License Division a record of an
adjudication under Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act of 1996, for a
violation under this section; and
(B)  the provisions regarding suspension of a driver's license under Section
78A-6-606 apply; and
(ii)  for a minor who is at least 18 years old, but younger than 21 years old:
(A)  the court shall forward to the Driver License Division a record of
conviction for a violation under this section; and
(B)  the Driver License Division shall suspend the person's license under
Section 53-3-220.
(3)  When the Department of Public Safety receives the arrest or conviction
record of an individual for a driving offense committed while the individual's
license is suspended pursuant to this section, the Department of Public Safety
shall extend the suspension for an additional like period of time.
(4)  A court may not fail to enter a judgment of conviction under this section
under a plea in abeyance agreement.
